Utah statutes.
31A-8a-202.5.   Reporting of administrative actions and criminal prosecution.

(1)  A health discount program operator or health discount program marketer shall report to the commissioner any administrative action or criminal prosecution brought against the health discount program operator, health discount program marketer, or an owner, officer, or principal of the health discount program operator or health discount program marketer, other than an administrative action brought by the department.

(2)  The health discount program operator or health discount program marketer shall file the report described in Subsection (1):

(a)  at the time the health discount program operator or health discount program marketer files an application for licensure or renewal; and

(b) (i)  for an administrative action that occurs on or after the day on which the health discount program operator or health discount program marketer files an application for licensure or renewal, within 30 days after the day on which the final disposition of the administrative action is issued; or

(ii)  for a criminal prosecution, within 30 days after the health discount program operator's or health discount program marketer's initial appearance before a court.

(3)  The report described in Subsection (1) shall include:

(a)  a copy of the complaint or other relevant legal documents related to the administrative action or criminal prosecution; and

(b)  an explanation or other information that the health discount program operator or health discount program marketer desires to submit in relation to the action or charge.



Enacted by Chapter 135, 2013 General Session

